Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.090

Trial by jury—Juror's fees.

In all civil cases and criminal cases where jurisdiction is concurrent with district courts as provided in RCW 35.20.250, within the jurisdiction of the municipal court, the plaintiff or defendant may demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens of the state who shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district courts, or the trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That no jury trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A defendant requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee which shall be the same as that for a jury in district court. Where there is more than one defendant in an action and one or more of them requests a jury, only one jury fee shall be collected by the court. Each juror may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for each day in attendance upon the municipal court, and in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060: PROVIDED, That the compensation paid jurors shall be determined by the legislative authority of the city and shall be uniformly applied. Trial by jury shall be allowed in criminal cases involving violations of city ordinances commencing January 1, 1972, unless such incorporated city affected by this chapter has made provision therefor prior to January 1, 1972.

[ 1987 c 202 s 195; 1980 c 148 s 6. Prior: 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 24; 1979 ex.s. c 135 s 8; prior: 1977 ex.s. c 248 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 53 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.090; prior: 1955 c 290 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Effective date—1980 c 148: See note following RCW 46.10.490.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 135: See note following RCW 2.36.080.